Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2031YH (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. 405 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514C.18A Prescription insulin drugs 1 ââ coverage. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âCost-sharingâ means any coverage limit, copayment, 5 coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket expense 6 obligation imposed on a covered person by a policy, contract, 7 or plan providing for third-party payment or prepayment of 8 health or medical expenses. 9 b. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, or 10 other person participating in a policy, contract, or plan that 11 provides for third-party payment or prepayment of health or 12 medical expenses. 13 c. âHealth care professionalâ means the same as defined in 14 section 514J.102. 15 d. âPrescription insulin drugâ means a prescription drug 16 that contains insulin, is used to treat diabetes, that has been 17 prescribed as medically necessary by a covered personâs health 18 care professional, and is a benefit covered by the covered 19 personâs policy, contract, or plan. 20 2. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment requirements 21 of section 514C.6, a policy, contract, or plan providing for 22 third-party payment or prepayment of health or medical expenses 23 that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall cap the 24 total amount of cost-sharing that a covered person is required 25 to pay per prescription filled to an amount not to exceed 26 twenty-five dollars for up to a thirty-one-day supply of at 27 least one type of each of the following: 28 a. Rapid-acting prescription insulin drugs. 29 b. Short-acting prescription insulin drugs. 30 c. Intermediate-acting prescription insulin drugs. 31 d. Long-acting prescription insulin drugs. 32 3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit 33 a policy, contract, or plan providing for third-party payment 34 or prepayment of health or medical expenses from reducing a 35 -1- LSB 2031YH (1) 91 nls/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 405 covered personâs cost-sharing obligation by an amount greater 1 than the amount specified pursuant to subsection 2. 2 4. a. This section shall apply to the following classes 3 of third-party payment provider contracts, policies, or plans 4 delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this 5 state on or after January 1, 2026: 6 (1) Individual or group accident and sickness insurance 7 providing coverage on an expense-incurred basis. 8 (2) An individual or group hospital or medical service 9 contract issued pursuant to chapter 509, 514, or 514A. 10 (3) An individual or group health maintenance organization 11 contract regulated under chapter 514B. 12 (4) A plan established for public employees pursuant to 13 chapter 509A. 14 b. This section shall not apply to accident-only, specified 15 disease, short-term hospital or medical, hospital confinement 16 indemnity, credit, dental, vision, Medicare supplement, 17 long-term care, basic hospital and medical-surgical expense 18 coverage as defined by the commissioner of insurance, 19 disability income insurance coverage, coverage issued as a 20 supplement to liability insurance, workersâ compensation or 21 similar insurance, or automobile medical payment insurance. 22 5. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 23 chapter 17A to administer this section. 24